California statutes. Labor Code
(4) Prior salary shall not justify any disparity in compensation. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to mean that an employer may not make a compensation decision based on a current employee’s
 existing salary, so long as any wage differential resulting from that compensation decision is justified by one or more of the factors listed in this subdivision.

(c) Any employer who violates subdivision (a) or (b) is liable to the employee affected in the amount of the wages, and interest thereon, of which the employee is deprived by reason of the violation, and an additional equal amount as liquidated damages.

(d) The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall administer and enforce this section. If the division finds that an employer has violated this section, it may supervise the payment of wages and interest found to be due and unpaid to employees under subdivision (a) or (b). Acceptance of payment in full made by an employer and approved by the division shall constitute a waiver
 on the part of the employee of the employee’s cause of action under subdivision (h).

(e) Every employer shall maintain records of the wages and wage rates, job classifications, and other terms and conditions of employment of the persons employed by the employer. All of the records shall be kept on file for a period of three years.

(f) Any employee may file a complaint with the division that the wages paid are less than the wages to which the employee is entitled under subdivision (a) or (b) or that the employer is in violation of subdivision (k). The complaint shall be investigated as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 98.7. The division shall keep confidential the name of any employee who submits to the division a complaint regarding an alleged violation of subdivision (a),
 (b), or (k) until the division establishes the validity of the complaint, unless the division must abridge confidentiality to investigate the complaint. The name of the complaining employee shall remain confidential if the complaint is withdrawn before the confidentiality is abridged by the division. The division shall take all proceedings necessary to enforce the payment of any sums found to be due and unpaid to these employees.

(g) The department or division may commence and prosecute, unless otherwise requested by the employee or affected group of employees, a civil action on behalf of the employee and on behalf of a similarly affected group of employees to recover unpaid wages and liquidated damages under subdivision (a) or (b), and in addition shall be entitled to recover costs of suit. The consent of any employee to the bringing of any
 action shall constitute a waiver on the part of the employee of the employee’s cause of action under subdivision (h) unless the action is dismissed without prejudice by the department or the division, except that the employee may intervene in the suit or may initiate independent action if the suit has not been determined within 180 days from the date of the filing of the complaint.

(h) An employee receiving less than the wage to which the employee is entitled under this section may recover in a civil action the balance of the wages, including interest thereon, and an equal amount as liquidated damages, together with the costs of the suit and reasonable attorney’s fees, notwithstanding any agreement to work for a lesser wage.

(i) (1) A civil action to
 recover wages under subdivision (a) or (b) may be commenced no later than three years after the last date the cause of action occurs.

(2) An employee is entitled to obtain relief for the entire period of time in which a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) exists, but not to exceed six years.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a cause of action occurs when any of the following occur:

(A) An
 alleged unlawful compensation decision or other practice is adopted.

(B) An individual becomes subject to an alleged unlawful compensation decision or other practice.

(C) When an individual is affected by application of an alleged unlawful compensation decision or other practice, including each time wages, benefits, or other compensation is paid, resulting in whole or in part from the
 decision or other practice.

(4) Nothing in this subdivision shall prohibit the application of the doctrine of “continuing violation” or the “discovery rule” to any appropriate claim.

(j) If an employee recovers amounts due to the employee under subdivision (c), and also files a complaint or brings an action under subdivision (d) of Section 206 of Title 29 of the United States Code which results in an additional recovery under federal law for the same violation, the employee shall return to the employer the amounts recovered under subdivision (c), or the amounts recovered under federal law, whichever is less.

(k) (1) An employer shall not discharge, or in any manner discriminate or retaliate against,
 any employee by reason of any action taken by the employee to invoke or assist in any manner the enforcement of this section. If an employer engages in any action prohibited by this section within 90 days of the protected activity specified in this section, there shall be a rebuttable presumption in favor of the employee’s claim. An employer shall not prohibit an employee from disclosing the employee’s own wages, discussing the wages of others, inquiring about another employee’s wages, or aiding or encouraging any other employee to exercise their rights under this section. Nothing in this section creates an obligation to disclose wages.

(2) Any employee who has been discharged, discriminated or retaliated against, in the terms and conditions of their employment because the employee engaged in any conduct delineated in this section may
 recover in a civil action reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by the acts of the employer, including interest thereon, as well as appropriate equitable relief.

(3) A civil action brought under this subdivision may be commenced no later than one year after the cause of action occurs.

(l) As used in this section:

(1) “Employer” includes public and private employers. Section 1199.5 does not apply to a public employer.

(2) “Sex” has the same meaning as defined in Section 12926 of the Government Code.

(3) “Wages” and “wage rates” include all forms of pay, including,
 but not limited to, salary, overtime pay, bonuses, stock, stock options, profit sharing and bonus plans, life insurance, vacation and holiday pay, cleaning or gasoline allowances, hotel accommodations, reimbursement for travel expenses, and benefits.
 Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to define “wages” or “wage rates” for purposes of any other section of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 468, Sec. 2.   (SB 642)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1198.

The maximum hours of work and the standard conditions of labor fixed by the commission shall be the maximum hours of work and the standard conditions of labor for employees. The employment of any employee for longer hours than those fixed by the order or under conditions of labor prohibited by the order is unlawful.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

1198.3.

(a) The Chief of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement may, when in his or her judgment hardship will result, exempt any employer or employees from any mandatory day or days off requirement contained in any order of the commission. Any exemption granted by the chief pursuant to this section shall be only of sufficient duration to permit the employer or employees to comply with the requirements contained in the order of the commission, but not more than one year. The exemption may be renewed by the chief only after he or she has investigated and is satisfied that a good faith effort is being made to comply with the order of the commission.

(b) No employer shall discharge or in any other manner discriminate against any employee who refuses to work hours in excess of those permitted by the order of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 620, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1198.4.

Upon request, the Chief of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall make available to the public any enforcement policy statements or interpretations of orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission. Copies of such policy statements shall be furnished to the Industrial Welfare Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1083.)
-------------------------------------------

1198.5.

(a) (1) Every current and former employee, or their representative, has the right to inspect and receive a copy of the personnel records that the employer maintains relating to the employee’s performance, including education or training records, or to any grievance concerning the employee.

(2) An employer who maintains education or training records shall ensure those records include all of the following:

(A) The name of the employee.

(B) The name of the
 training provider.

(C) The duration and date of the training.

(D) The core competencies of a training, including skills in equipment or software.

(E) The resulting certification or qualification.

(b) (1) The employer shall make the contents of those personnel records available for inspection to the current or former employee, or their representative, at reasonable intervals and at reasonable times, but not later than 30 calendar days from the date the employer receives a written request, unless the current or former employee, or their representative, and the employer agree in writing to a date beyond 30 calendar days to inspect the records, and the agreed-upon date does not exceed 35 calendar
 days from the employer’s receipt of the written request. Upon a written request from a current or former employee, or their representative, the employer shall also provide a copy of the personnel records, at a charge not to exceed the actual cost of reproduction, not later than 30 calendar days from the date the employer receives the request, unless the current or former employee, or their representative, and the employer agree in writing to a date beyond 30 calendar days to produce a copy of the records, as long as the agreed-upon date does not exceed 35 calendar days from the employer’s receipt of the written request. Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), the employer is not required to make those personnel records or a copy thereof available at a time when the employee is actually required to render service to the employer, if the requester is the employee.

(2) (A) For purposes of this section, a
 request to inspect or receive a copy of personnel records shall be made in either of the following ways:

(i) Written and submitted by the current or former employee or their representative.

(ii) Written and submitted by the current or former employee or their representative by completing an employer-provided form.

(B) An employer-provided form shall be made available to the employee or their representative upon verbal request to the employee’s supervisor or, if known to the employee or their representative at the time of the request, to the individual the employer designates under this section to receive a verbal request for the form.

(c) The employer shall do all of the following:

(1) With regard to all employees, maintain a copy of each employee’s personnel records for a period of not less than three years after termination of employment.

(2) With regard to current employees, make a current employee’s personnel records available for inspection, and, if requested by the employee or their representative, provide a copy thereof, at the place where the employee reports to work, or at another location agreeable to the employer and the requester. If the employee is required to inspect or receive a copy at a location other than the place where they report to work, no loss of compensation to the employee is permitted.

(3) (A) With regard to former employees, make a former employee’s personnel records available for inspection, and, if requested by the employee or their representative, provide a copy thereof, at the location where
 the employer stores the records, unless the parties mutually agree in writing to a different location. A former employee may receive a copy by mail if they reimburse the employer for actual postal expenses.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), if a former employee seeking to inspect their personnel records was terminated for a violation of law, or an employment-related policy, involving harassment or workplace violence, the employer may comply with the request by doing one of the following:

(I) Making the personnel records available to the former employee for inspection at a location other than the workplace that is within a reasonable driving distance of the former employee’s residence.

(II) Providing a copy of the personnel records by mail.

(ii) Nothing in this subparagraph shall limit a former employee’s right to receive a copy of their personnel records.

(d) An employer is required to comply with only one request per year by a former employee to inspect or receive a copy of their personnel records.

(e) The employer may take reasonable steps to verify the identity of a current or former employee or their authorized representative. For purposes of this section, “representative” means a person authorized in writing by the employee to inspect, or receive a copy of, their personnel records.

(f) The employer may designate the person to whom a request is made.

(g) Before making records specified in subdivision (a) available for
 inspection or providing a copy of those records, the employer may redact the name of any nonsupervisory employee contained therein.

(h) The requirements of this section do not apply to:

(1) Records relating to the investigation of a possible criminal offense.

(2) Letters of reference.

(3) Ratings, reports, or records that were:

(A) Obtained prior to the employee’s employment.

(B) Prepared by identifiable examination committee members.

(C) Obtained in connection with a promotional examination.

(4) Employees who are subject to the Public Safety Officers Procedural Bill of Rights (Chapter 9.7 (commencing with Section 3300) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(5) Employees of agencies subject to the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Title 1.8 (commencing with Section 1798) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).

(i) If a public agency has established an independent employee relations board or commission, an employee shall first seek relief regarding any matter or dispute relating to this section from that board or commission before pursuing any available judicial remedy.

(j) In enacting this section, it is the intent of the Legislature to establish minimum standards for the inspection and the receipt of a copy of personnel records by employees. Nothing in this section shall be
 construed to prevent the establishment of additional rules for the inspection and the receipt of a copy of personnel records that are established as the result of agreements between an employer and a recognized employee organization.

(k) If an employer fails to permit a current or former employee, or their representative, to inspect or copy personnel records within the times specified in this section, or times agreed to by mutual agreement as provided in this section, the current or former employee or the Labor Commissioner may recover a penalty of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) from the employer.

(l) A current or former employee may also bring an action for injunctive relief to obtain compliance with this section, and may recover costs and reasonable attorney’s fees in such an action.

(m) Notwithstanding
 Section 1199, a violation of this section is an infraction. Impossibility of performance, not caused by or resulting from a violation of law, may be asserted as an affirmative defense by an employer in any action alleging a violation of this section.

(n) If an employee or former employee files a lawsuit that relates to a personnel matter against their employer or former employer, the right of the employee, former employee, or their representative to inspect or copy personnel records under this section ceases during the pendency of the lawsuit in the court with original jurisdiction.

(o) For purposes of this section, a lawsuit “relates to a personnel matter” if a current or former employee’s personnel records are relevant to the lawsuit.

(p) An employer is not required to comply with more than 50 requests under this
 section to inspect and receive a copy of personnel records filed by a representative or representatives of employees in one calendar month.

(q) This section does not apply to an employee covered by a valid collective bargaining agreement if the agreement expressly provides for all of the following:

(1) The wages, hours of work, and working conditions of employees.

(2) A procedure for the inspection and copying of personnel records.

(3) Premium wage rates for all overtime hours worked.

(4) A regular rate of pay of not less than 30 percent more than the state minimum wage rate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 654, Sec. 1.   (SB 513)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1199.

Every employer or other person acting either individually or as an officer, agent, or employee of another person is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or by imprisonment for not less than 30 days, or by both, who does any of the following:

(a) Requires or causes any employee to work for longer hours than those fixed, or under conditions of labor prohibited by an order of the commission.

(b) Pays or causes to be paid to any employee a wage less than the minimum fixed by an order of the commission.

(c) Violates or refuses or neglects to comply with any provision of this chapter or any order or ruling of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 205.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

1199.5.

Every employer or other person acting either individually or as an officer, agent, or employee of another person is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both, who willfully does any of the following:

(a) Pays or causes to be paid any employee a wage less than the rate paid to an employee of another sex, race, or ethnicity, as required by Section 1197.5.

(b) Reduces the wages of any employee in order to comply with Section 1197.5.

No
 person shall be imprisoned pursuant to this section except for an offense committed after the conviction of the person for a prior offense pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 866, Sec. 2.   (SB 1063)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1200.

In every prosecution for violation of any provision of this chapter, the minimum wage, the maximum hours of work, and the standard conditions of labor fixed by the commission shall be presumed to be reasonable and lawful.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1201.

The commission shall not act as a board of arbitration during a strike or lockout.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1202.

Upon the request of the commission, the department shall cause such statistics and other data and information to be gathered, and investigations made, as the commission may require. The cost thereof shall be paid out of the appropriations made for the expenses of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 92.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.

The commission may publish and distribute from time to time reports and bulletins covering its operations and proceedings under this chapter and such other matters relative thereto which it deems advisable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1204.

No order made by the commission under the provisions of Sections 1182 or 1184 of this chapter shall be effective unless and until compliance is had with the provisions of Section 1178 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 208.)
-------------------------------------------

1205.

(a) As used in this section and in Section 1206:

(1) “Local jurisdiction” means any city, county, district, or agency, or any subdivision or combination thereof.

(2) “State agency” means any state office, officer, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency, or any subdivision thereof.

(3) “Labor standards” means any legal requirements regarding wages paid, hours worked, and other conditions of employment.

(b) Local jurisdictions may enforce state labor standards requirements regarding the payment of wages set forth in Division 2 (commencing with Section
 200).

(c) This part shall not be deemed to restrict the exercise of local police powers in a more stringent manner.

(d) When a local jurisdiction expends funds that have been provided to it
 by a state agency, operates a program that has received assistance from a state agency, or engages in an activity that has received assistance from a state agency, labor standards established by the local jurisdiction through exercise of local police powers or spending powers shall take effect with regard to that expenditure, program, or activity, so long as those labor standards are not in explicit conflict with, or explicitly preempted by, state law. A state agency may not require as a condition to the receipt of state funds or assistance that a local jurisdiction refrain from applying labor standards established by the local jurisdiction to expenditures, programs, or activities supported by the state funds or assistance in question.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 124, Sec. 33.   (AB 938)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1206.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this code establishes minimum penalties for failure to comply with wage-related statutes and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 655, Sec. 11.   (AB 469)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1207.

In any instance in which an employer is required to physically post information, an employer may also distribute that information to employees by email with the document or documents attached. Email distribution pursuant to this section shall not alter the employer’s obligation to physically display
 the required posting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 109, Sec. 1.   (SB 657)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Social Compliance Audits [1250. - 1251.]

1250.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Child” means a natural person under 18 years of age.

(b) “Child labor” means any work performed by a child in violation of state or federal law. 

(c) “Clear and conspicuous” means in larger type than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from the surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks that call attention to the language.

(d) “Social compliance
 audit” means a voluntary, nongovernmental inspection or assessment of an employer’s operations or practices to evaluate whether the operations or practices are in compliance with state and federal labor laws, including, but not limited to, wage and hour and health and safety regulations, including those regarding child labor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 438, Sec. 1.   (AB 3234)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1251.

(a) An employer who has voluntarily subjected itself to a social compliance audit, whether the audit is conducted in part, or in whole, to determine if child labor is involved in the employer’s operations or practices, shall post a clear and conspicuous link on its internet website to a report detailing the findings of the employer’s compliance with child labor laws.

(b) A report described in subdivision (a) shall contain all of the following:

(1) The year, month, day, and time the audit was conducted, and whether the audit was conducted during a day shift or night shift.

(2) Whether the employer did or did not engage in, or support the use of, child labor.

(3) A copy of any written policies and procedures the employer has and had regarding child employees.

(4) Whether the employer exposed children to any workplace situations that were hazardous or unsafe to their physical and
 mental health and development.

(5) Whether children worked within or outside regular school hours, or during night hours, for the employer.

(6) A statement that the auditing company is not a government agency and is not authorized to verify compliance with state and federal labor laws or other health and safety regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 438, Sec. 1.   (AB 3234)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Occupational Privileges and Restrictions [1285. - 1312.]

1285.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting Sections 1286 to 1289, inclusive, to establish a citation system for the imposition of prompt and effective civil sanctions against violators of the laws and regulations of this state relating to the employment of minors. The civil penalties provided for in this chapter are in addition to any other penalty provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 145.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1286.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Director” means the Director of Industrial Relations or the director’s designee.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Industrial Relations.

(c) “Minor” means any person under the age of 18 years who is required to attend school under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 48200) and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 48400) of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code and any person under the age of six years. A person under the age of 18 years who is not required to attend school under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 48200) and Chapter 3
 (commencing with Section 48400) of Part 27 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code solely because that person is a nonresident of California shall still be considered a minor.

(d) “Labor Commissioner” means the Chief of the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement, or the chief’s deputies or agents, who shall have the authority to conduct informal hearings and determine the amount of civil penalties in accordance with this chapter.

(e) “Door-to-door sales” has the same meaning as “home solicitation contract or offer,” as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1689.5 of the Civil Code, except that “door-to-door sales” is not subject to the minimum monetary limitation set forth in that subdivision.

(f) “Entertainment industry” means motion pictures of any type, including, but not limited to, film or videotape, using any format, including, but not limited to, theatrical film, commercial, documentary, or television program, by any medium, including, but not limited to, theater, television, or videocassette; photography; recording; modeling; theatrical productions; publicity; rodeos; circuses; musical performances; advertising; and any other performances where a minor performs to entertain the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 283, Sec. 1.   (AB 267)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1287.

If upon inspection or investigation the director determines that a person is in violation of any statutory provision or rule or regulation relating to the employment of minors, he or she may issue a citation to the person in violation. The citation may be served personally, in the same manner as provided for service of a summons as described in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 413.10) of Title 5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, by certified mail with return receipt requested, or by registered mail in accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 11505 of the Government Code. Each citation shall be in writing and shall describe the nature of the violation, including reference to the statutory provisions, rule, or regulation alleged to have been violated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 13.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

1288.

Citations issued pursuant to this chapter shall be classified according to the nature of the violation and shall indicate the classification on the face thereof, as follows:

(a) Class “A” violations are violations of Section 1290, 1292, 1293, 1293.1, 1294, 1294.1, 1294.5, 1308, 1308.1, or 1392, and any other violations that the director determines present an imminent danger to minor employees or a substantial probability that death or serious physical harm would result therefrom. The violation of Section 1391 for the third or subsequent time shall also constitute a class “A” violation. A physical condition or one or more practices, means, methods, or operations in use in a place of employment may constitute a violation. A class “A” violation is
 subject to a civil penalty in an amount not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each and every violation. Willful or repeated violations shall receive higher civil penalties than those imposed for comparable nonwillful or first violations, not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) Class “B” violations are violations of Section 1299 or 1308.5, or a violation of Section 1391 for the first and second time, and those other violations that the director determines have a direct or immediate relationship to the health, safety, or security of minor employees, other than class “A” violations. A class “B” violation is subject to a civil penalty in an amount not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each and every violation. Willful or repeated violations shall receive higher civil penalties than those imposed for comparable nonwillful or
 first violations. A second violation of Section 1391 is subject to a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(c) This section does not preclude the imposition of criminal penalties provided for in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 147.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1289.

(a) If a person desires to contest a citation or the proposed assessment of a civil penalty therefor, he or she shall within 15 business days after service of the citation notify the office of the Labor Commissioner that appears on the citation of his or her request for an informal hearing. The Labor Commissioner or the commissioner’s deputy or agent shall, within 30 days, hold a hearing at the conclusion of which the citation or proposed assessment of a civil penalty shall be affirmed, modified, or dismissed. The decision of the Labor Commissioner shall consist of a notice of findings, findings, and order that shall be served on all parties to the hearing within 15 days after the hearing by regular first-class mail at the last known address of the party on file with the Labor Commissioner. Service shall be completed pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Any amount found due by the Labor Commissioner as a result of a hearing shall become due and payable 45 days after notice of the findings and written findings and order have been mailed to the party assessed. A writ of mandate may be taken from that finding to the appropriate superior court, as long as the party agrees to pay any judgment and costs ultimately rendered by the court against the party for the assessment. The writ shall be taken within 45 days of service of the notice of findings, findings, and order thereon.

(b) A person to whom a citation has been issued, shall, in lieu of contesting a citation pursuant to this section, transmit to the office of the Labor Commissioner designated on the citation the amount specified for the violation within 15 business days after issuance of the citation.

(c) When no petition objecting to a citation or the proposed assessment of a civil penalty is filed, a certified copy of the citation or proposed civil penalty may be filed by the Labor Commissioner in the office of the clerk of the superior court in any county in which the person assessed has property or in which the person assessed has or had a place of business. The clerk, immediately upon the filing, shall enter judgment for the state against the person assessed in the amount shown on the citation or proposed assessment of a civil penalty.

(d) When findings and the order thereon are made affirming or modifying a citation or proposed assessment of a civil penalty after hearing, a certified copy of the findings and the order entered thereon may be entered by the Labor Commissioner in the office of the clerk of the superior court in any county in which the person assessed has property or in which the person assessed has or had a place of business. The clerk, immediately upon the filing, shall enter judgment for the state against the person assessed in the amount shown on the certified order.

(e) A judgment entered pursuant to this section shall bear the same rate of interest and shall have the same effect as other judgments and be given the same preference allowed by law on other judgments rendered for claims for taxes. The clerk shall make no charge for the service provided by this section to be performed by him or her.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 483.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1290.

A minor under the age of 16 years shall not be employed, permitted, or suffered to work in or in connection with any manufacturing establishment or other place of labor or employment at any time except as may be provided in this chapter or by the provisions of Part 27 (commencing with Section 48000) of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 148.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1291.

Work is done for a manufacturing establishment within the meaning of this chapter whenever it is done at any place upon the work of a manufacturing establishment, or upon any of the materials entering into the products of a manufacturing establishment, whether under contract or arrangement with any person in charge of or connected with a manufacturing establishment directly or indirectly through contractors or third persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 149.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1292.

No minor under the age of sixteen years shall be employed or permitted to work in any capacity in:

(a) Adjusting any belt to any machinery.

(b) Sewing or lacing machine belts in any workshop or factory.

(c) Oiling, wiping, or cleaning machinery, or assisting therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1293.

No minor under the age of sixteen years shall be employed, or permitted, to work in any capacity in operating or assisting in operating any of the following machines:

(a) Circular or band saws; wood shapers; wood-jointers; planers; sandpaper or wood-polishing machinery; wood turning or boring machinery.

(b) Picker machines or machines used in picking wool, cotton, hair, or other material; carding machines; leather-burnishing machines; laundry machinery.

(c) Printing-presses of all kinds; boring or drill presses; stamping machines used in sheet-metal and tinware, in paper and leather manufacturing, or in washer and nut factories; metal or paper-cutting machines; paper-lace machines.

(d) Corner-staying machines in paper-box factories; corrugating rolls, such as are used in corrugated paper, roofing or washboard factories.

(e) Dough brakes or cracker machinery of any description.

(f) Wire or iron straightening or drawing machinery; rolling-mill machinery; power punches or shears; washing, grinding or mixing machinery; calendar rolls in paper and rubber manufacturing; steam-boilers; in proximity to any hazardous or unguarded belts, machinery or gearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1293.1.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c) of Section 1394, no minor under the age of 12 years may be employed or permitted to work, or accompany or be permitted to accompany an employed parent or guardian, in an agricultural zone of danger. As used in this section, “agricultural zone of danger” means any or all of the following:

(1) On or about moving equipment.

(2) In or about unprotected chemicals.

(3) In or about any unprotected water hazard.

The Department of Industrial Relations may, after hearing, determine other hazards that constitute an agricultural zone of danger.

(b) Except for employment described in subdivision (a) of Section 1394, no minor under the age of 12 years may be employed or permitted to work, or accompany an employed parent or guardian, in any of the occupations declared hazardous for employment of minors below 16 years of age in Section 570.71 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that regulation may be amended from time to time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1175, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1294.

No minor under the age of 16 years shall be employed or permitted to work in any capacity:

(a) Upon any railroad, whether steam, electric, or hydraulic.

(b) Upon any vessel or boat engaged in navigation or commerce within the jurisdiction of this state.

(c) In, about, or in connection with any processes in which dangerous or poisonous acids are used, in the manufacture or packing of paints, colors, white or red lead, or in soldering.

(d) In occupations causing dust in injurious quantities, in the manufacture or use of dangerous or poisonous dyes, in the manufacture or preparation of compositions with dangerous or poisonous gases, or in the manufacture or use of compositions of lye in which the quantity thereof is injurious to health.

(e) On scaffolding, in heavy work in the building trades, in any tunnel or excavation, or in, about or in connection with any mine, coal breaker, coke oven or quarry.

(f) In assorting, manufacturing or packing tobacco.

(g) Operating any automobile, motorcar, or truck.

(h) In any occupation dangerous to the life or limb, or injurious to the health or morals of the minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1175, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1294.1.

(a) No minor under the age of 16 years shall be employed or permitted to work in either of the following:

(1) Any occupation declared particularly hazardous for the employment of minors below the age of 16 years in Section 570.71 of Subpart E-1 of Part 570 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that regulation may be revised from time to time.
